Wyoming, session 2025, HB0337.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-24-202 and 22-25-116 are created
to read:
22-24-202. Prohibition of foreign funding influencing
statewide ballot measures.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Foreign national" means as defined in 52
U.S.C. § 30121(b);
(ii) "Prohibited source" means contributions
from or expenditures by a foreign national;
(iii) "Directly or indirectly" means acting
either alone or jointly with, through or on behalf of any
other committee, organization, person or entity.
(b) No foreign national shall direct, control or
otherwise directly or indirectly participate in the
decision making of any group that is required to file with
the secretary of state under W.S. 22-24-201(a).
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0337
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) Each group of persons that is required to file
with the secretary of state under W.S. 22-24-201(a) shall
file an accompanying certification regarding funding from
prohibited sources as provided in this paragraph. The
certification shall include the following statements:
(i) That no expenditure of the group was
knowingly, whether directly or indirectly, funded by a
prohibited source;
(ii) That the group shall not knowingly, whether
directly or indirectly, receive, solicit or accept
contributions or expenditures from a prohibited source in
any manner;
(iii) That the group will keep records of
contributions and expenditures for a period of not less
than five (5) years to enable the enforcement of this
section.
(d) For each contribution to a group of persons that
is required to file with the secretary of state under W.S.
22-24-201(a), before accepting the contribution the group
shall obtain affirmation from the donor that the donor is
not a foreign national and that the donor has not knowingly
accepted, whether directly or indirectly, more than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in aggregate from
prohibited sources in the immediately preceding four (4)
year period.
(e) The secretary of state may bring a civil action
to enforce the provisions of this section. A violation of
this section is subject to a civil penalty of up to twice
the amount of any prohibited contribution or expenditure.
The secretary of state may obtain injunctive relief from a
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0337
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
court of competent jurisdiction to prevent further
violations of this section.
22-25-116. Prohibition of foreign funding influencing
statewide ballot measures.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Directly or indirectly" means acting either
alone or jointly with, through or on behalf of any
committee, organization, person or entity;
(ii) "Foreign national" means as defined in 52
U.S.C. § 30121(b);
(iii) "Prohibited source" means contributions
from or expenditures by a foreign national.
(b) No foreign national shall direct, control or
otherwise directly or indirectly participate in the
decision making of any political action committee or
organization supporting or opposing any statewide
initiative or referendum petition drive. No foreign
national shall solicit, directly or indirectly, the making
of a donation, contribution or expenditure by another
person to influence a ballot initiative.
(c) Each political action committee or organization
supporting or opposing any statewide initiative or
referendum that is required to file reports with the
secretary of state under W.S. 22-25-107(a)(vii) shall file
an accompanying certification regarding funding from
prohibited sources as provided in this paragraph and each
itemized statement of contributions and expenditures
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0337
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
required by W.S. 22-25-106(b) or (h). The certification
shall include the following statements:
(i) That no expenditure of the political action
committee or organization was knowingly, whether directly
or indirectly, funded by a prohibited source;
(ii) That the political action committee or
organization shall not knowingly, whether directly or
indirectly, receive, solicit or accept contributions or
expenditures from a prohibited source in any manner;
(iii) That the political action committee or
organization will keep records of contributions and
expenditures for a period of not less than five (5) years
to enable the enforcement of this section.
(d) For each contribution to a political action
committee or organization supporting or opposing any
statewide initiative or referendum petition that is
required to file reports with the secretary of state under
W.S. 22-25-107(a)(vii), before accepting the contribution
the group shall obtain affirmation from the donor that the
donor is not a foreign national and that the donor has not
knowingly, whether directly or indirectly, accepted more
than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in
aggregate from prohibited sources in the immediately
preceding four (4) year period.
(e) The secretary of state may bring a civil action
to enforce the provisions of this section. A violation of
this section is subject to a civil penalty of up to twice
the amount of any prohibited contribution or expenditure.
The secretary of state may obtain injunctive relief from a
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0337
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
court of competent jurisdiction to prevent further
violations of this section.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5